src-fst-stems-pronouns.lexc.md
# This file contains the Pronouns

* **LEXICON Pronoun   ** Points to all the pronoun subgrops

* **LEXICON Personal   ** , splitting in 1st, 2nd, 3rd

## Interrogative pronouns

Giving ideosyncratic Sg Nom of gii, mii lexically
Sending the oblique forms of gii, mii to an oblique sublexicon
Giving the stem of guhte, guhtemuš, goabbá

* **LEXICON Interrogative   **

## Relative pronouns

* **LEXICON Relative   **

## Demonstrative pronouns

## Giving baseform + all demonstrative stems
## Pointing to case paradigms

* **LEXICON Demonstrative   **

## Reflexive pronouns

Two nominative reflexives, and pointer to the rest
The Pl one is used for Du as well, here given two entries.
Should one of them be removed?

* **LEXICON Reflexive   **

## Reciprocal pronouns

The first 4 entries handle the first element of the recipr.
The next 12 handle the 2nd part of the non-Px recipr.
The members of the third section  point to Px lexica.

* **LEXICON Reciprocal   **

## Indefinite pronouns

Dividing the indefinites in three groups

* **LEXICON Indefinite   **

Declineable indefinite pronouns with case + clitic

* **LEXICON declindef-cl   **

Declineable indefinites with normal case paradigms

* **LEXICON declindef   **

Separate lexica for exceptional entries

* **LEXICON declindef-idiosync   **
separate lexica for these entries:
oktat

The indeclineable indefinites

* **LEXICON indeclindef   **

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc)</small>

---
